Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 7. Transition

Cross references. —

As to applicability of this chapter to Wyoming Cooperative Utilities Act (chapter 20 of this title), see §

17-20-104

.

As to investment securities generally, see § 34.1-8-101 et seq.

As to secured transactions generally, see § 34.1-9-101 et seq.

As to securities issued by gas and electric corporations, see chapter 6 of title 37.

As to issuance of corporate bonds by railroads, see §

37-9-101

.

Blue sky laws have as their primary purpose

the suppression of fraudulent practices and the protection of the public from their own gullibility. Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 17-4-701.
Application of act to existing proceeding and existing rights and duties.

The predecessor act exclusively governs all actions or proceedings that are pending on the effective date of this act or may be instituted on the basis of conduct occurring before the effective date of this act, but a civil action may not be maintained to enforce any liability under the predecessor act unless instituted within any period of limitation that applied when the cause of action accrued or within five (5) years after the effective date of this act, whichever is earlier.

All effective registrations under the predecessor act, all administrative orders relating to the registrations, rules, statements of policy, interpretative opinions, declaratory rulings, no action determinations, and conditions imposed on the registrations under the predecessor act remain in effect while they would have remained in effect if this act had not been enacted. They are considered to have been filed, issued, or imposed under this act, but are exclusively governed by the predecessor act.

The predecessor act exclusively applies to an offer or sale made within one (1) year after the effective date of this act pursuant to an offering made in good faith before the effective date of this act on the basis of an exemption available under the predecessor act.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.